Nebraska, session 109, LB564.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB564 LB564
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-7304, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-7304 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund is
created. The fund shall only be used pursuant to the School District
Property Tax Relief Act. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
(2)(a) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven hundred fifty
million dollars from the General Fund to the School District Property Tax
Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2024-25, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that seven hundred eighty
million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2025-26.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that eight hundred eight
million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2026-27.
(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that eight hundred thirty-
eight million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2027-28.
(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that eight hundred seventy
million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2028-29.
(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that nine hundred two
million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2029-30.
(b) (g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the amount
transferred from the General Fund to the School District Property Tax
Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2025-26 2030-31 and each fiscal year
-2-

LB564 LB564
2025 2025
thereafter be equal to the total amount transferred in the preceding
fiscal year increased by one hundred fifty million dollars three percent.
Sec. 2. Section 77-7305, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-7305 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Act shall apply
to tax year 2024 and each tax year thereafter. For tax year 2024, the
total amount of relief granted under the act shall be seven hundred fifty
million dollars. For tax year 2025, the total amount of relief granted
under the act shall be seven hundred eighty million dollars. For tax year
2026, the total amount of relief granted under the act shall be eight
hundred eight million dollars. For tax year 2027, the total amount of
relief granted under the act shall be eight hundred thirty-eight million
dollars. For tax year 2028, the total amount of relief granted under the
act shall be eight hundred seventy million dollars. For tax year 2029,
the total amount of relief granted under the act shall be nine hundred
two million dollars. For tax year 2025 2030 and each tax year thereafter,
the total amount of relief granted under the act shall be the total
amount of relief from the prior year increased by one hundred fifty
million dollars three percent. The relief shall be in the form of
property tax credits which appear on property tax statements. Property
tax credits granted under the act shall be credited against the amount of
property taxes owed to school districts.
(2) To determine the amount of the property tax credit for each
parcel, the county treasurer shall multiply the amount disbursed to the
county under subsection (4) of this section by the ratio of the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on the parcel to the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on all real property in the
county. The amount so determined shall be the property tax credit for
that parcel.
(3) If the real property owner qualifies for a homestead exemption
under sections 77-3501 to 77-3529, the owner shall also be qualified for
-3-

LB564 LB564
2025 2025
the property tax credit provided in this section to the extent of any
remaining liability after calculation of the homestead exemption. If the
property tax credit provided in this section results in a property tax
liability on the homestead that is less than zero, the amount of the
credit which cannot be used by the taxpayer shall be returned to the
Property Tax Administrator by July 1 of the year the amount disbursed to
the county was disbursed. The Property Tax Administrator shall
immediately credit any funds returned under this subsection to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund. Upon the return of any funds
under this subsection, the county treasurer shall electronically file a
report with the Property Tax Administrator, on a form prescribed by the
Tax Commissioner, indicating the amount of funds distributed to each
school district in the county in the year the funds were returned and the
amount of unused credits returned.
(4) The amount disbursed to each county under this section shall be
equal to the amount available for disbursement under subsection (1) of
this section multiplied by the ratio of the school district taxes levied
in the prior year on all real property in the county to the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on all real property in the
state. By September 15, 2024, and by September 15 of each year
thereafter, the Property Tax Administrator shall determine the amount to
be disbursed under this subsection to each county and shall certify such
amounts to the State Treasurer and to each county. The disbursements to
the counties shall occur in two equal payments, the first on or before
January 31 and the second on or before April 1.
(5) The county treasurer shall disburse amounts received under
subsection (4) of this section, which are credited against the amount of
property taxes owed to school districts, in the same manner as if such
funds had been received in the form of property tax payments for property
taxes owed to school districts, meaning any amounts attributable to
divided taxes pursuant to section 18-2147 of the Community Development
-4-

LB564 LB564
2025 2025
Law shall be remitted to the applicable authority for which such taxes
were divided.
(6) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund shall be
used for purposes of making the disbursements to counties required under
subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 3. Original sections 77-7304 and 77-7305, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-5-